Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.410

Reserve officers—Credit for service.

Credit for service as a reserve officer shall not be counted for purposes of RCW 41.24.170 except as stated in this section: Within one year of an election to cover reserve officers under the retirement provisions of this chapter, the municipality must elect, on a one-time basis, one of the following:

(1)(a) To count credit for service only after July 23, 1995;

(b) To pay annual fees only for service after July 23, 1995; or

(2)(a) To count credit for all service as a reserve officer, but only if the actuarial cost, as determined by the state board, is paid by the municipality. The municipality may charge reserve officers for any portion of the cost; and

(b) To pay annual fees only for service after July 23, 1995; or

(3)(a) To count credit for all service as a reserve officer, but only if the actuarial cost, as determined by the state board, is paid by the municipality. The municipality may charge reserve officers for any portion of the cost; and

(b) To pay annual fees for service prior to July 23, 1995, if:

(i) The reserve officer elects, within one year of the municipality's election under this section, to pay the annual fee plus one percent per month interest for each year of past service counted; and

(ii) The municipality pays the actuarial cost, as determined by the state board, of the benefit provided in (b) of this subsection. The municipality may charge reserve officers for any portion of the cost.

Payments under this section may be made in a lump sum or in a manner prescribed by the state board.

[ 1995 c 11 s 4.]